Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh S.F. 335 Section 1. Section 256.146, subsection 13, paragraph 1 b, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new 2 subparagraphs: 3 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (5) A court finds that the person has 4 violated section 279.74, subsection 2. 5 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) A court finds that the person has 6 violated section 279.80. 7 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) A court finds that the person knew 8 of a violation of section 279.87, subsection 2, by a school 9 district but failed to report such violation. 10 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 13 requirements of section 279.87 related to prohibitions and 14 requirements related to diversity, equity, and inclusion in the 15 same manner as a school district. 16 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 19 requirements of section 279.87 related to prohibitions and 20 requirements related to diversity, equity, and inclusion in the 21 same manner as a school district. 22 Sec. 4. Section 279.74, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 23 by adding the following new paragraphs: 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âAdministratorâ means the same as 25 defined in section 256.145. 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. âTeacherâ means the same as defined in 27 section 256.145. 28 Sec. 5. Section 279.74, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsections: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. a. (1) A parent or guardian of a 31 student enrolled in the school district, or an employee of the 32 school district, who alleges a violation of subsection 2 by a 33 contractor or teacher may bring a civil action for injunctive 34 relief against the school district that hired the contractor or 35 -1- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 1/ 14 S.F. 335 employs the teacher to prohibit the contractor or teacher from 1 continuing such violation. 2 (2) A parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school 3 district, or an employee of the school district, who alleges 4 that an administrator knew of a violation of subsection 2 by 5 a contractor or teacher but failed to stop such violation may 6 bring a civil action for injunctive relief against the school 7 district that employs the administrator to require the school 8 district to prohibit the contractor or teacher from continuing 9 such violation. 10 b. If a parent, guardian, or employee is the prevailing 11 party in a civil action instituted pursuant to paragraph âaâ , 12 all of the following shall apply: 13 (1) The court shall award reasonable court costs and 14 attorney fees to the parent, guardian, or employee. 15 (2) The court shall assess a fifty thousand dollar civil 16 penalty against the school district that hired the contractor 17 or employs the teacher or administrator. Moneys from the civil 18 penalty provided in this subparagraph shall be remitted to 19 the treasurer of state for deposit in the general fund of the 20 state. 21 (3) The clerk of court shall send a copy of the courtâs 22 order issued pursuant to this subsection to the board of 23 educational examiners. 24 NEW SUBSECTION . 2B. If, after investigation, the 25 department of education determines that a teacher has violated 26 subsection 2, or that an administrator knew of a violation of 27 subsection 2 by a contractor or teacher but failed to stop 28 such violation, and no civil action has been instituted under 29 subsection 2A, the teacher or administrator, as applicable, 30 shall be subject to the following: 31 a. (1) For the teacherâs first violation of subsection 2, 32 the department shall issue a written warning to the teacher. 33 (2) The first time in which the administrator knew of a 34 violation of subsection 2 by a contractor or teacher but failed 35 -2- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 2/ 14 S.F. 335 to stop such violation, the department shall issue a written 1 warning to the administrator. 2 b. (1) For the teacherâs second or subsequent violation 3 of subsection 2, if the department finds that the teacher 4 knowingly violated subsection 2, the teacher shall be subject 5 to a hearing conducted by the board of educational examiners 6 pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may result 7 in disciplinary action. 8 (2) The second or subsequent time in which the administrator 9 knew of a violation of subsection 2 by a contractor or teacher 10 but failed to stop such violation, the administrator shall be 11 subject to a hearing conducted by the board of educational 12 examiners pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may 13 result in disciplinary action. 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 2C. If a parent or guardian of a student 15 enrolled in the school district, or an employee of the school 16 district, is not satisfied with the result of a hearing 17 conducted under subsection 2B, paragraph âbâ , the parent, 18 guardian, or employee may do any of the following: 19 a. Report the teacherâs violation of subsection 2, or the 20 administratorâs failure to stop a teacherâs or contractorâs 21 violation of subsection 2, to the state board of education for 22 investigation and potential further enforcement. 23 b. Report the teacherâs violation of subsection 2, or the 24 administratorâs failure to stop a teacherâs or contractorâs 25 violation of subsection 2, to the attorney general for 26 investigation and potential further enforcement. 27 c. Bring a civil action for injunctive relief against the 28 school district that employs the teacher or administrator to 29 prohibit further violations of subsection 2. 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 2D. If a parent or guardian of a student 31 enrolled in the school district, or an employee of the school 32 district, believes that a teacher has violated subsection 33 2, or that an administrator failed to stop a teacherâs or 34 contractorâs violation of subsection 2, the parent, guardian, 35 -3- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 3/ 14 S.F. 335 or employee may report the teacherâs potential violation or the 1 administratorâs failure to stop a potential violation to the 2 director of the department of education. 3 Sec. 6. Section 279.74, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 4 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 d. Create Except as provided in subsections 3, 4, and 6 5, create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, 7 enforceable at law or in equity by any party against the state 8 of Iowa, its departments, agencies, or entities, its officers, 9 employees, or agents, or any other person. 10 Sec. 7. Section 279.80, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraphs: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âAdministratorâ means the same as 13 defined in section 256.145. 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. âTeacherâ means the same as defined in 15 section 256.145. 16 Sec. 8. Section 279.80, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsections: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. (1) A parent or guardian of a 19 student enrolled in the school district, or an employee of the 20 school district, who alleges a violation of subsection 2 by a 21 contractor or teacher may bring a civil action for injunctive 22 relief against the school district that hired the contractor or 23 employs the teacher to prohibit the contractor or teacher from 24 continuing such violation. 25 (2) A parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school 26 district, or an employee of the school district, who alleges 27 that an administrator knew of a violation of subsection 2 by 28 a contractor or teacher but failed to stop such violation may 29 bring a civil action for injunctive relief against the school 30 district that employs the administrator to require the school 31 district to prohibit the contractor or teacher from continuing 32 such violation. 33 b. If a parent, guardian, or employee is the prevailing 34 party in a civil action instituted pursuant to paragraph âaâ , 35 -4- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 4/ 14 S.F. 335 all of the following shall apply: 1 (1) The court shall award reasonable court costs and 2 attorney fees to the parent, guardian, or employee. 3 (2) The court shall assess a fifty thousand dollar civil 4 penalty against the school district that hired the contractor 5 or employs the teacher or administrator. Moneys from the civil 6 penalty provided in this subparagraph shall be remitted to 7 the treasurer of state for deposit in the general fund of the 8 state. 9 (3) The clerk of court shall send a copy of the courtâs 10 order issued pursuant to this subsection to the board of 11 educational examiners. 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If, after investigation, the department 13 of education determines that a teacher has violated subsection 14 2, or that an administrator knew of a violation of subsection 2 15 by a contractor or teacher but failed to stop such violation, 16 and no civil action has been instituted under subsection 3, the 17 teacher or administrator, as applicable, shall be subject to 18 the following: 19 a. (1) For the teacherâs first violation of subsection 2, 20 the department shall issue a written warning to the teacher. 21 (2) The first time in which the administrator knew of a 22 violation of subsection 2 by a contractor or teacher but failed 23 to stop such violation, the department shall issue a written 24 warning to the administrator. 25 b. (1) For the teacherâs second or subsequent violation 26 of subsection 2, if the department finds that the teacher 27 knowingly violated subsection 2, the teacher shall be subject 28 to a hearing conducted by the board of educational examiners 29 pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may result 30 in disciplinary action. 31 (2) The second or subsequent time in which the administrator 32 knew of a violation of subsection 2 by a contractor or teacher 33 but failed to stop such violation, the administrator shall be 34 subject to a hearing conducted by the board of educational 35 -5- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 5/ 14 S.F. 335 examiners pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may 1 result in disciplinary action. 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. If a parent or guardian of a student 3 enrolled in the school district, or an employee of the school 4 district, is not satisfied with the result of a hearing 5 conducted under subsection 4, paragraph âbâ , the parent, 6 guardian, or employee may do any of the following: 7 a. Report the teacherâs violation of subsection 2, or the 8 administratorâs failure to stop a teacherâs or contractorâs 9 violation of subsection 2, to the state board of education for 10 investigation and potential further enforcement. 11 b. Report the teacherâs violation of subsection 2, or the 12 administratorâs failure to stop a teacherâs or contractorâs 13 violation of subsection 2, to the attorney general for 14 investigation and potential further enforcement. 15 c. Bring a civil action for injunctive relief against the 16 school district that employs the teacher or administrator to 17 prohibit further violations of subsection 2. 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. If a parent or guardian of a student 19 enrolled in the school district, or an employee of the school 20 district, believes that a teacher has violated subsection 21 2, or that an administrator failed to stop a teacherâs or 22 contractorâs violation of subsection 2, the parent, guardian, 23 or employee may report the teacherâs potential violation or the 24 administratorâs failure to stop a potential violation to the 25 director of the department of education. 26 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Diversity, equity, and 27 inclusion ââ prohibitions. 28 1. For purposes of this section: 29 a. âAdministratorâ means the same as defined in section 30 256.145. 31 b. âDiversity, equity, and inclusionâ includes all of the 32 following: 33 (1) Any effort to promote differential treatment of or 34 provide special benefits to individuals on the basis of race, 35 -6- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 6/ 14 S.F. 335 color, or ethnicity. 1 (2) Any effort to promote or promulgate policies and 2 procedures designed or implemented with reference to race, 3 color, or ethnicity. 4 (3) Any effort to promote or promulgate trainings, 5 programming, or activities designed or implemented with 6 reference to race, color, ethnicity, gender identity, or sexual 7 orientation. 8 (4) Any effort to promote, as the official position 9 of the school district, a particular, widely contested 10 opinion referencing unconscious or implicit bias, 11 cultural appropriation, allyship, transgender ideology, 12 microaggressions, group marginalization, antiracism, systemic 13 oppression, social justice, intersectionality, neopronouns, 14 heteronormativity, disparate impact, gender theory, racial 15 privilege, sexual privilege, or any related formulation of 16 these concepts. 17 c. âDiversity, equity, and inclusion officeâ means any 18 division, office, center, or other unit of a school district 19 that is responsible for creating, developing, designing, 20 implementing, organizing, planning, or promoting policies, 21 programming, training, practices, activities, or procedures 22 related to diversity, equity, and inclusion. âDiversity, 23 equity, and inclusion officeâ does not include a registered 24 student organization. 25 2. A school district shall not, except as otherwise provided 26 by federal or state law, do any of the following: 27 a. Establish or maintain a diversity, equity, and inclusion 28 office. 29 b. Hire or assign an employee of the school district, 30 or contract with a third party, to perform the duties of a 31 diversity, equity, or inclusion office. 32 3. a. A parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the 33 school district, or an employee of the school district, who 34 alleges that an administrator knew of a violation of subsection 35 -7- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 7/ 14 S.F. 335 2 by a school district but failed to stop such violation may 1 bring a civil action for injunctive relief against the school 2 district that employs the administrator to prohibit the school 3 district from continuing such violation. 4 b. If a parent, guardian, or employee is the prevailing 5 party in a civil action instituted pursuant to paragraph âaâ , 6 all of the following shall apply: 7 (1) The court shall award reasonable court costs and 8 attorney fees to the parent, guardian, or employee. 9 (2) The court shall assess a fifty thousand dollar civil 10 penalty against the school district. Moneys from the civil 11 penalty provided in this subparagraph shall be remitted to 12 the treasurer of state for deposit in the general fund of the 13 state. 14 (3) The clerk of court shall send a copy of the courtâs 15 order issued pursuant to this subsection to the board of 16 educational examiners. 17 4. If, after investigation, the department of education 18 determines that an administrator knew of a violation of 19 subsection 2 by a school district but failed to stop such 20 violation, and no civil action has been instituted under 21 subsection 3, the administrator shall be subject to the 22 following: 23 a. The first time in which the administrator knew of a 24 violation of subsection 2 by a school district but failed to 25 stop such violation, the department shall issue a written 26 warning to the administrator. 27 b. The second or subsequent time in which the administrator 28 knew of a violation of subsection 2 by a school district but 29 failed to stop such violation, the administrator shall be 30 subject to a hearing conducted by the board of educational 31 examiners pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may 32 result in disciplinary action. 33 5. If a parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the 34 school district, or an employee of the school district, is 35 -8- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 8/ 14 S.F. 335 not satisfied with the result of a hearing conducted under 1 subsection 4, paragraph âbâ , the parent, guardian, or employee 2 may do any of the following: 3 a. Report the administratorâs failure to stop the school 4 districtâs violation of subsection 2 to the state board of 5 education for investigation and potential further enforcement. 6 b. Report the administratorâs failure to stop the school 7 districtâs violation of subsection 2 to the attorney general 8 for investigation and potential further enforcement. 9 c. Bring a civil action for injunctive relief against the 10 school district that employs the administrator to prohibit 11 further violations of subsection 2. 12 6. If a parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the 13 school district, or an employee of the school district, 14 believes that an administrator failed to stop a school 15 districtâs violation of subsection 2, the parent, guardian, 16 or employee may report the administratorâs failure to stop 17 a potential violation to the director of the department of 18 education. 19 Sec. 10. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1152, section 31, 20 subsection 3, is amended to read as follows: 21 3. âPublic institution of higher educationâ means an includes 22 all of the following: 23 a. An institution of higher learning governed by the state 24 board of regents. 25 b. A community college established under chapter 260C. 26 Sec. 11. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1152, section 35, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 SEC. 35. NEW SECTION . 261J.5 Enforcement. 29 1. Any person may notify the attorney general of a public 30 institution of higher educationâs potential violation of 31 section 261J.2 . The attorney general may bring an action 32 against a public institution of higher education for a writ of 33 mandamus to compel the public institution of higher education 34 to comply with section 261J.2 . 35 -9- LSB 1509XS (9) 91 jda/jh 9/ 14 S.F. 335 2. a. A student enrolled in a public institution of 1 higher education, or an employee of a public institution of 2 higher education, who alleges that a public institution of 3 higher education violated section 261J.2 may bring a civil 4 action for injunctive relief against the public institution of 5 higher education to prohibit the public institution of higher 6 education from continuing such violation. 7 b. If a student or employee is the prevailing party in a 8 civil action instituted pursuant to paragraph âaâ , all of the 9 following shall apply: 10 (1) The court shall award reasonable court costs and 11 attorney fees to the student or employee. 12 (2) The court shall assess a one hundred thousand dollar 13 civil penalty against the public institution of higher 14 education. Moneys from the civil penalty provided in this 15 subparagraph shall be remitted to the treasurer of state for 16 deposit in the general fund of the state. 17 (3) The public institution of higher education shall 18 immediately terminate the employment of any employee who is 19 responsible for the public institution of higher educationâs 20 violation of section 261J.2. 21